Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-6.5] Interim rulemaking. (a)
The department, subject to the provisions of this section, may declare any
indigenous species as endangered and establish, implement, and enforce interim
rules governing the exportation from the State or the taking, possession, sale,
offer for sale, delivery, or transport within the State, by any means
whatsoever, of any such endangered species. These rules shall not be subject
to chapter 91.

(b) An interim rule may be adopted in the
event that the exportation, taking, possession, sale, offer for sale, delivery,
or transport of any indigenous species, in the absence of effective rules,
creates a significant risk of a local extirpation or species extinction, which
is so imminent in nature as to constitute an emergency. No interim rule may be
adopted without such finding by the department.

(c) Interim rules adopted pursuant to this
section shall be effective as stated by the rules; provided that:

(1) Any interim rule shall be published statewide at
least once as provided in section 1-28.5(a)(1) within five days after issuance;
and

(2) No interim rule shall be effective for more than
one hundred eighty days. [L 2004, c 32, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next